Utah statutes.
17B-1-312.   Training for board members.
(1)  Each member of a board of trustees of a local district, elected or
appointed on or after May 3, 1999, should, within one year after taking
office, complete the training described in Subsection (2).
(2)  In conjunction with the Utah Association of Special Districts, the state
auditor shall:
(a)  develop a training curriculum for the members of local district boards;
and
(b)  with the assistance of other state offices and departments the state
auditor considers appropriate and at times and locations established by the
state auditor, carry out the training of members of local district boards.
(3) (a)  A local district board of trustees may compensate each member of the
board up to $100 per day for each day of training described in Subsection (2)
that the member completes.
(b)  The per diem amount authorized under Subsection (3)(a) is in addition to
all other amounts of compensation and expense reimbursement authorized under
this chapter.
(c)  A board of trustees may not pay compensation under Subsection (3)(a) to
any board member more than once per year.
(4)  The state auditor shall issue a certificate of completion to each board
member that completes the training described in Subsection (2).
